New York, session 2025-2026, S9119.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs (i), (j), and (k) of subdivision 1 of section 2 124 of the public service law, as added by chapter 272 of the laws of 3 1970 and as relettered by chapter 119 of the laws of 1978, are amended 4 to read as follows: 5 (i) a municipality entitled to receive notice under paragraph (a) of 6 subdivision two of section one hundred twenty-two, if it has filed with 7 the commission a notice of intent to be a party, within [thirty] forty- 8 five days after the date given in the notice as the date for filing of 9 the application. 10 (j) any individual resident in a municipality entitled to receive 11 notice under paragraph (a) of subdivision two of section one hundred 12 twenty-two, if [he has] they have filed with the commission a notice of 13 intent to be a party, within [thirty] forty-five days after the date 14 given in the published notice as the date for filing of the application. 15 (k) any domestic non-profit corporation or association, formed in 16 whole or in part to promote conservation or natural beauty, to protect 17 the environment, personal health or other biological values, to preserve 18 historical sites, to promote consumer interests, to represent commercial 19 and industrial groups or to promote the orderly development of the areas 20 in which the facility is to be located, if it has filed with the commis- 21 sion a notice of intent to become a party, within [thirty] forty-five 22 days after the date given in the published notice as the date for filing 23 of the application. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14682-01-6